District of Columbia statutes.
2-1217.101

Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Qualified Zone Academy Revenue Bond Project Forward Commitment Approval Act of 2005”.

History

Oct. 18, 2005, D.C. Law 16-28, § 1, 52 DCR 8093

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see §§ 2 to 18 of Qualified Zone Academy Revenue Bond Project Forward Commitment Approval Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-143, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7171).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority—Qualified Zone Academy Revenue Bond Project Forward Commitment Approval Act of 2005, see Mayor’s Order 2007-93, April 13, 2007 ( 54 DCR 8873).

Resolutions

Resolution 17-495, the “Qualified Zone Academy Revenue Bonds Project Approval Resolution of 2008”, was approved effective January 8, 2008.